Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-914.03
Videoconferencing, defined.

Videoconferencing means conducting or participating in a hearing or evaluation electronically or telephonically with audiovisual interaction among the participants.

Laws 2025, LB150, § 107.